ko: 계란 영양 강화: 아스타잔틴 강화; 고단백; 루테인 강화; 오메가-3 강화; 무강화; 비타민 D 강화; 기타
sv: Äggberikning: Astaxantinberikad; Hög proteinhalt; Luteinberikad; Omega-3-berikad; Oberikad; D-vitaminberikad; Övrigt
vi: Làm giàu trứng: Giàu astaxanthin; Giàu protein; Giàu lutein; Giàu omega-3; Không làm giàu dưỡng chất; Giàu vitamin D; Khác
th: การเสริมสารอาหารในไข่: เสริมแอสตาแซนธิน; โปรตีนสูง; เสริมลูทีน; เสริมโอเมก้า 3; ไม่เสริมสารอาหาร; เสริมวิตามินดี; อื่นๆ
ru: Обогащение яйца: Обогащенные астаксантином; Высокое содержание белка; Обогащенные лютеином; Обогащенные омега-3; Без обогащения; Обогащенные витамином D; Другое
da: Berigelse af æg: Beriget med astaxanthin; Højt proteinindhold; Beriget med lutein; Beriget med omega-3; Ikke-beriget; Beriget med D-vitamin; Andet
cs: Přídatné látky ve vejcích: Obohaceno o astaxanthin; Vysoký obsah bílkovin; Obohaceno o lutein; Obohaceno o omega-3; Neobohaceno; Obohaceno o vitamín D; Jiné
pt-BR: Enriquecimento de ovos: Enriquecido com astaxantina; Rico em proteínas; Enriquecido com luteína; Enriquecido com ômega 3; Sem enriquecimento; Enriquecido com vitamina D; Outro
en: Egg enrichment: Astaxanthin enriched; High protein; Lutein enriched; Omega-3 enriched; Unenriched; Vitamin D enriched; Other
es: Enriquecimiento de huevos: Enriquecido con astaxantina; Alto en proteínas; Enriquecido con luteína; Enriquecido con omega-3; No enriquecido; Enriquecido con vitamina D; Otro
zh-CN: 蛋品营养强化: 富含虾青素; 高蛋白; 富含叶黄素; 富含 Omega-3; 未强化; 富含维生素 D; 其他
hr-HR: Obogaćivanje jaja: Obogaćeno astaksantinom; S visokim udjelom proteina; Obogaćeno luteinom; Obogaćeno omega-3 masnim kiselinama; Neobogaćeno; Obogaćeno vitaminom D; Ostalo
ro-RO: Îmbogățirea cu ouă: Îmbogățit cu astaxantină; Bogat în proteine; Îmbogățit cu luteină; Îmbogățit cu Omega-3; Neîmbogățit; Îmbogățit cu vitamina D; Altele
fr: Enrichissement des œufs: Enrichi en astaxanthine; Riche en protéines; Enrichi en lutéine; Enrichi en oméga-3; Non enrichi; Enrichi en vitamine D; Autre
hu: Tojásdúsítás: Asztaxantinnal dúsított; Magas fehérjetartalmú; Luteinnel dúsított; Omega-3-mal dúsított; Nem dúsított; D-vitaminnal dúsított; Egyéb
fi: Munan rikastaminen: Astaksantiinirikastettu; Korkeaproteiininen; Luteiinirikastettu; Omega-3-rikastettu; Rikastamaton; D-vitamiinirikastettu; Muu
it: Arricchimento delle uova: Arricchito con astaxantina; Ad alto contenuto proteico; Arricchito con luteina; Arricchito con omega-3; Non arricchito; Arricchito con vitamina D; Altro
sk-SK: Obohacovanie vajec: Obohatené o astaxantín; S vysokým obsahom bielkovín; Obohatené o luteín; Obohatené o omega-3; Neobohatené; Obohatené o vitamín D; Iné
nb: Eggberikelse: Astaxanthin-beriket; Høyt proteininnhold; Lutein-beriket; Omega-3-beriket; Uberiket; Vitamin D-beriket; Annet
tr: Yumurtada besinsel zenginleştirme: Astaksantin katkılı; Yüksek proteinli; Lutein katkılı; Omega-3 katkılı; Katkısız; D vitamini katkılı; Diğer
lt-LT: Kiaušinių praturtinimas: Praturtinta astaksantinu; Daug baltymų; Praturtinta liuteinu; Praturtinta omega-3; Nepraturtinta; Praturtinta vitaminu D; Kita
ja: 卵の栄養強化: アスタキサンチン強化; 高タンパク質; ルテイン強化; オメガ3強化; 強化なし; ビタミンD強化; その他
el: Ενίσχυση αυγών: Εμπλουτισμένο με ασταξανθίνη; Υψηλή περιεκτικότητα σε πρωτεΐνη; Εμπλουτισμένο με λουτεΐνη; Εμπλουτισμένο με ωμέγα-3; Μη εμπλουτισμένο; Εμπλουτισμένο με βιταμίνη D; Άλλο
bg-BG: Обогатяване на яйца: Обогатени с астаксантин; С високо съдържание на протеин; Обогатени с лутеин; Обогатени с омега-3; Необогатени; Обогатени с витамин D; Друго
nl: Ei verrijking: Verrijkt met astaxanthine; Eiwitrijk; Verrijkt met luteïne; Verrijkt met omega 3; Niet-verrijkt; Verrijkt met vitamine D; Overige
zh-TW: 雞蛋營養強化: 富含蝦紅素; 高蛋白; 富含葉黃素; 富含 Omega-3; 未強化營養; 富含維生素 D; 其他
pl: Wzbogacenie jaj: Wzbogacone astaksantyną; Wysokobiałkowe; Wzbogacone luteiną; Wzbogacone omega-3; Niewzbogacone; Wzbogacone witaminą D; Inne
de: Eieranreicherung: Mit Astaxanthin angereichert; Hoher Proteingehalt; Mit Lutein angereichert; Mit Omega-3 angereichert; Nicht angereichert; Mit Vitamin D angereichert; Sonstige
sl-SI: Obogatitev jajc: Obogateno z astaksantinom; Visoka vsebnost beljakovin; Obogateno z luteinom; Obogateno z omega-3; Neobogateno; Obogateno z vitaminom D; Drugo
pt-PT: Enriquecimento de ovos: Enriquecido com astaxantina; Rico em proteínas; Enriquecido com luteína; Enriquecido com ómega-3; Não enriquecido; Enriquecido com vitamina D; Outro